Washington statutes.
RCW 35.44.350

Reassessments, assessments on omitted property, supplemental assessments—Provisions governing.

All of the provisions of law relating to the filing of assessment rolls, time and place for hearing thereon, notice of hearing, the hearing upon the roll, the confirmation of the assessment roll, the time when the assessments become a lien upon the property assessed, the proceedings on appeal from any such assessment, the method of collecting the assessment and all proceedings for enforcing the lien thereof shall be had and conducted the same in the case of reassessments, assessments on omitted property, or supplemental assessments as in the case of an original assessment.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.44.350. Prior: 1911 c 98 s 44; 1893 c 95 s 1; RRS s 9397.]